New York, session 2025-2026, S2067.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The veterans' services law is amended by adding a new 2 section 5-a to read as follows: 3 § 5-a. Veteran career assistance. The state commissioner, together 4 with the chancellor of the state university of New York and the chancel- 5 lor of the city university of New York, shall establish a veteran career 6 assistance program. Such program shall provide veterans with assistance 7 in resume writing and employment placement services. The program shall 8 be developed and maintained with resources already available to the 9 division and the university systems including, but not limited to, 10 campus veterans service offices, career centers, and opportunity 11 centers. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred twentieth day after 13 it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05774-01-5